Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
State Archives and Records
171.720.
Agency recovery of records.

The head of each state and local agency shall notify the department of any actual, impending or threatened unlawful removal, defacing, alteration or destruction of records in the custody of the agency that shall come to his attention, and with the assistance of the department shall initiate action through the Attorney General for recovery of such records as shall have been unlawfully removed and for such other redress as may be provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 32; 1970, ch. 92, § 56.

171.730.
Effect on public accounting and confidential nature of agency records.

Nothing in KRS

171.410

to

171.740

shall be construed as limiting the authority of the State Auditor, or other officers charged with prescribing accounting systems, forms, or procedures or of lessening the responsibility of collecting and disbursing officers for rendering of their accounts for settlement. Nothing in KRS

171.410

to

171.740

shall be construed as changing, modifying or affecting the present law or laws concerning confidential records of any state agency and the use thereof. All such laws remain in full force and effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 33.

171.740.
General Assembly records.

The Legislative Research Commission shall, unless otherwise directed by the Senate or House of Representatives obtain at the close of each session of the General Assembly all of the noncurrent records of the General Assembly and of each committee thereof and transfer them to the State Archives and Records Center for preservation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 49, § 34.